Wyoming, session 2026, HB0077.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 15-1-603 is repealed.

Section 2. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
impair or prohibit the consideration of any protest filed
under W.S. 15-1-603(a), as repealed by section 1 of this
act, before July 1, 2026.

HB0077

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0419
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0077